Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1609
Special coverages; availability.

The special coverages permitted by sections 84-1607 and 84-1608 shall be made available uniformly to all employees, but each employee shall retain the option to choose the special coverage or coverages which he or she desires or to reject all such special coverages.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 7;

Laws 1974, LB 789, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1626.